North Carolina, session 2025, HB748.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality, Division of Water Infrastructure, to provide a grant to the City of
Greensboro (City) for planning and other preliminary work for water and wastewater extensions
to economic development sites at Piedmont Triad International Airport.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H748-v-1*